Utah statutes.
31A-40-208.   Benefit plan.
(1)  A client and a professional employer organization licensed under this
chapter shall each be considered an employer for purposes of sponsoring a
retirement or welfare benefit plan for a covered employee.
(2)  A fully insured welfare benefit plan offered to a covered employee of a
single professional employer organization licensed under this chapter:
(a)  is to be treated as a single employer welfare benefit plan for purposes
of this title and rules made under this title;
(b)  may not be considered an employer welfare fund or plan, as described in
Section 31A-13-101; and
(c)  the single professional employer organization that sponsors the fully
insured welfare plan is exempt from the registration requirements under this
title for:
(i)  an insurance provider; or
(ii)  an employer welfare fund or plan.
(3)  For purposes of Chapter 30, Individual, Small Employer, and Group Health
Insurance Act:
(a)  a professional employer organization licensed under this chapter is
considered the employer of a covered employee; and
(b)  all covered employees of one or more clients participating in a health
benefit plan sponsored by a single professional employer organization licensed
under this chapter are considered employees of that professional employer
organization.
(4)  A professional employer organization licensed under this chapter may
offer to a covered employee a health benefit plan that is not fully insured by
an authorized insurer, only if:
(a)  the professional employer organization has operated as a professional
employer organization for at least one year before the day on which the
professional employer organization offers the health benefit plan; and
(b)  the health benefit plan:
(i)  is administered by a third-party administrator licensed to do business in
this state;
(ii)  holds all assets of the health benefit plan, including participant
contributions, in a trust account;
(iii)  has and maintains reserves that are sound for the health benefit plan
as determined by an actuary who:
(A)  uses generally accepted actuarial standards of practice; and
(B)  is an independent qualified actuary, including not being an employee or
covered employee of the professional employer organization;
(iv)  provides written notice to a covered employee participating in the
health benefit plan that the health benefit plan is self-insured or is not
fully insured; and
(v)  consents to an audit:
(A)  on a random basis; or
(B)  upon a finding of a reasonable need by the commissioner.
(5)  The cost of an audit described in Subsection (4)(b)(v) shall be paid by
the sponsoring professional employer organization.
(6)  A plan of a professional employer organization described in Subsection
(4) that is not fully insured:
(a)  is subject to the requirements of this section; and
(b)  is not subject to another licensure or approval requirement of this
title.
